Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.005

Becoming or ceasing to be a social purpose corporation.

(1) Any corporation may elect to be governed as a social purpose corporation by one of the following means:

(a) One or more persons may act as incorporator or incorporators of a social purpose corporation by delivering articles of incorporation that conform to the requirements of this chapter to the secretary of state for filing; or

(b) Any corporation which is not a social purpose corporation may elect to become a social purpose corporation by complying with RCW 23B.25.130.

(2) Any social purpose corporation may elect to cease to be governed as a social purpose corporation by complying with RCW 23B.25.140.

[ 2012 c 215 s 1.]